Vermont, session 2025-2026, S176.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Paraquat or paraquat dichloride is a synthetic, nonselective contact
herbicide that is a member of the bipyridylium chemical family and that kills
all vegetation that it touches.
(2) Paraquat was first registered in the United States in 1964, and in
1978, the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) classified all paraquat
products as restricted use pesticides because of paraquat’s high acute toxicity
and potential for poisoning.
VT LEG #384798 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.176
2026 Page 2 of 4
(3) Paraquat has been widely used throughout the United States since its
classification as a restricted use pesticide, and 24 currently registered pesticide
products approved for use in the United States contain paraquat.
(4) The Pesticide Action Network’s 2024 Consolidated List of Banned
Pesticides identifies 72 countries as banning the use of paraquat, including
Brazil, China, Malaysia, Peru, Saudi Arabia, South Korea, Thailand, Turkey,
Vietnam, and Zimbabwe.
(5) The European Union banned paraquat in 2007 after a court
determined that the relevant regulatory body had failed to apply proper
procedures for evaluation of the herbicide and that the regulatory body was not
properly thorough in its assessments of paraquat’s effects on human and
animal health.
(6) Multiple studies by the National Institutes of Health have
demonstrated that paraquat exposure substantially increases the risk of
Parkinson’s disease in those exposed to the herbicide.
(7) Studies by the National Institutes of Health and others have linked
exposure to paraquat to increased risk of non-Hodgkin lymphoma and
childhood leukemia.
(8) In 2021, as part of a product registration review of paraquat required
under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (FIFRA), the
EPA issued an interim decision approving the continued registration of
VT LEG #384798 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.176
2026 Page 3 of 4
paraquat for use in the United States, despite multiple public comments
objecting to approval and significant scientific evidence regarding the potential
health effects of paraquat exposure.
(9) Multiple parties subsequently moved to challenge the EPA interim
decision authorizing the continued registration and use of paraquat. In
particular, the challenging parties contested the EPA’s assessment of the
increased risk of Parkinson’s disease due to exposure to paraquat from
volatilization during use.
(10) In January 2025, after a petition from the EPA, a court allowed the
EPA to withdraw the interim registration approval for paraquat so that the EPA
may reconsider its initial conclusion concerning the potential for paraquat to
volatilize and to determine whether paraquat continues to meet FIFRA’s
registration standard.
(11) The EPA’s reevaluation of the risks of paraquat may take years,
and the EPA’s withdrawal of the interim registration and further evaluation
does not prohibit the continued use of paraquat during that review period.
(12) Instead of waiting for EPA action on whether or how to use
paraquat, the State of Vermont should ban the use of paraquat in order to
protect Vermonters from the known, significant health effects of exposure to
paraquat.
VT LEG #384798 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.176
2026 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 2. 6 V.S.A. § 1105d is added to read:
§ 1105d. USE AND SALE OF PARAQUAT
(a) Definition. As used in this section, “paraquat” means an herbicide:
(1) known as paraquat, with the chemical name 1,1\′-Dimethyl-4,4\′-
bipyridinium ion and the Chemical Abstracts Service (CAS) Registry
Number 4685-14-7; or
(2) known as paraquat dichloride, with the chemical name 1,1′-
Dimethyl-4,4′-bipyridinium dichloride and the CAS Registry Number 1910-
42-5.
(b) Prohibition. No person shall sell, use, or apply paraquat except when
authorized by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets under subsection
(c) of this section.
(c) Authorized use. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets may
authorize the sale, use, or application of paraquat upon a determination that a
threat to Vermont crops exists that requires the use of paraquat and no other
herbicide or class of herbicides would be effective in addressing the threat.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #384798 v.1